Arkansas, session 2025, HB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. FINDINGS AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (a) The
General Assembly finds that:
(1) The first court battle to implement the decision in Brown v.
Board of Education, 347 U.S. 483 (1954), was fought in the town of Hoxie,
Arkansas, which sparked the first federal support of integration after the
decision in Brown, supra, and the first court order overturning state
segregation laws;
(2) In the summer of 1955, the Hoxie School Board voluntarily
desegregated its schools and fully integrated all school facilities;
(3) The newly formed White Citizens’ Council saw the integration
as a test for southern resistance to the decision in Brown, supra, and
descended on Hoxie with efforts to force the Hoxie School Board to rescind
its desegregation;
*MBM082*
01-27-2025 09:01:39 MBM082

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 HB1194
(4) Despite these efforts, the Hoxie superintendent and the
Hoxie School Board stood their ground;
(5) With the help of the National Association for the
Advancement of Colored People, the Hoxie School Board sought an injunction
against segregationist groups, eventually drawing the United States
Government’s support in a case that nullified state segregation laws;
(6) Segregationist leaders were so furious over their loss in
the case that they turned on Governor Orval Faubus in the next primary,
forcing him out of his previously moderate stance and setting up the 1957
confrontation at Central High School in Little Rock, Arkansas;
(7) Life Magazine chronicled the Hoxie integration, which was
viewed as a success despite students, the families of students, and school
administrators experiencing dynamic challenges during this historic and
transformative time; and
(8) The first court battle for school desegregation in Hoxie
changed the face of Arkansas public schools.
(b) It is the intent of this act to place a monument on the State
Capitol grounds in recognition and appreciation of the historic integration
of Hoxie public schools in 1955.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1125(e)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) Before the expenditure of any moneys from the Arkansas
Capitol Grounds Monument and Memorial Preservation Fund for the maintenance,
repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep of any kind for a
specific monument or memorial areas on State Capitol grounds, if there is a
fund dedicated to that specific monument or memorial, the Secretary of State
shall utilize the gifts, grants, and donations made to the following funds
for the maintenance, repair, alteration, addition, reconstruction, or upkeep
of that specific monument or memorial:
(A) Vietnam Veterans' Veterans Monument Fund;
(B) Arkansas Military War Veterans Monument Fund;
(C) Ten Commandments Monument Display Act under § 22-3-
221;
(D) Gold Star Family Memorial Monument Fund; and
01-27-2025 09:01:39 MBM082

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 HB1194
(E) Arkansas Fallen Firefighters Memorial Board under §
22-3-1704; and
(F) Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 11, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1160. Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund.
(a) There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, and donations from
individuals and organizations as provided under the Hoxie: The First Stand
Memorial Monument Act, § 22-3-224, and other funds as may be provided by law.
(c) The fund shall be used exclusively for the purpose of erecting and
maintaining a suitable monument on the State Capitol grounds in recognition
and appreciation of the integration of Hoxie public schools in 1955, as
provided in the Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Act, § 22-3-224.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 22, Chapter 3, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
22-3-224. Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Act.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Hoxie: The
First Stand Memorial Monument Act”.
(b)(1) The Secretary of State shall permit and arrange for the
placement on the State Capitol grounds of a monument commemorating the
integration of Hoxie public schools in 1955.
(2) The monument shall be placed on the State Capitol grounds
where there are other monuments.
(3)(A) The monument shall be designed and constructed in the
manner recommended by Hoxie the First Stand Inc., or in a manner similar to
the design recommended by Hoxie the First Stand Inc.
(B) The Secretary of State shall approve the design and
site selection for the monument through consultation with the Capitol Arts
and Grounds Commission.
(c) The Secretary of State may accept gifts, grants, and donations
from individuals and organizations to be deposited as trust funds into the
01-27-2025 09:01:39 MBM082

As Engrossed: H1/27/25 HB1194
Hoxie: The First Stand Memorial Monument Fund.

/s/Cavenaugh

































01-27-2025 09:01:39 MBM082